Nebraska, session 109, LB487.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Restitution and Redress for Redlining Task Force Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) Historical Nebraska state laws and policies show with
indisputable proof that in 1935 the Omaha Home Owner Loan Corporation
created a map that designated neighborhoods red, yellow, blue, or green,
with red corresponding to "high risk" and green corresponding to "low
risk." Mortgage lenders based the level of home loan "risk" in each
neighborhood on factors such as race and immigration status. The Omaha
Home Owner Loan Corporation map designated neighborhoods in North and
South Omaha as yellow and red, while neighborhoods in West Omaha are
designated green. Omaha Home Owner Loan Corporation staff members,
working with local real estate professionals, including lenders,
developers, and real estate appraisers, assigned grades to residential
neighborhoods that reflected their "mortgage security" that would then be
visualized on color-coded maps. Neighborhoods receiving the highest grade
of "A," colored green on the maps, were deemed minimal risks for banks
and other mortgage lenders when they were determining who should receive
loans and which areas in the city were safe investments. Those receiving
the lowest grade of "D," colored red, were considered "hazardous."
Conservative, responsible lenders, in Omaha Home Owner Loan Corporation
judgment, would "refuse to make loans in these areas or only on a
conservative basis." Omaha Home Owner Loan Corporation created area
descriptions to help to organize the data they used to assign the grades.
Among that information was the neighborhood's quality of housing, the
recent history of sale and rent values, and, crucially, the racial and
ethnic identity and class of residents;
(2) As a result of these maps beginning in 1936, the neighborhoods
of Omaha's Near North and South Sides were systematically segregated from
the rest of the city by means of prohibitive and discriminatory home
lending practices. In Omaha and cities across the country, red lines were
-2-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
drawn on city maps by the Home Owners' Loan Corporation identifying
predominantly African-American and new American immigrant communities in
Nebraska such as: Latino and Hispanic communities, Asian communities, and
southern European communities, which included Russians, Poles, Czechs,
Germans and even Catholics as "hazardous" and "unfit for investment;"
(3) This discriminatory policy adopted and sanctioned by the State
of Nebraska was part of a pattern of national policies that practiced
these same prejudicial and preferential practices in cities and town
across the United States;
(4) Although Congress outlawed discriminatory lending policies in
the mid-twentieth century, federal policies leading up to that time
limited where people could live, creating geographic concentrations of
lower-income families and fueling suburban growth for higher-income
families. Official practices pertaining to zoning and mortgage lending,
along with restrictive covenants, impacted the shape of neighborhoods
across the country. The effect of those practices was illustrated through
federal redlining maps created by the Omaha Home Owner Loan Corporation
and advanced by the Federal Housing Administration. Although these
redlining maps conveyed reservations about lending in neighborhoods that
were already economically depressed, making the impact race played in
redlining difficult to isolate empirically, official practices outlined
in the Federal Housing Administration's Underwriting Manual make it clear
that race did indeed play a role in lending decisions;
(5) In spite of the Fair Housing Act of 1968, which broadly
prohibits discrimination in the sale or rental of housing, the red lines
drawn around Omaha continue to hold strong, leaving long-lasting effects
on communities today. Redlining denied access to financial services in
neighborhoods, concentrating disadvantages and resulting in higher
measures of social vulnerability today;
(6) A preponderance of scholarly, legal, and community evidentiary
documentation, as well as popular culture markers, constitute the basis
-3-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
for inquiry into the ongoing effects of the institution of redlining and
its legacy of persistent systemic structures of discrimination on living
Nebraskans;
(7) Following the abolition of redlining, the State of Nebraska has
continued to perpetuate, condone, and often profit from practices that
continue to disadvantage Nebraskans including an unjust generational
wealth gap, unequal education, substandard housing, loss of property, and
decreased property values; and
(8) As a result of the historic and continued discrimination,
Nebraskans in historically redlined communities continue to suffer
debilitating economic, educational, and health hardships.
Sec. 3. It is the purpose of the Restitution and Redress for
Redlining Task Force Act to establish a task force that will do all of
the following:
(1) Study and develop reparation proposals for Nebraskans as a
result of:
(a) The policies and practices of redlining, against all Nebraska
residents that were victims of redlining and their descendants, from the
end of the state-sanctioned practices of redlining to the present,
including economic, political, educational, and social discrimination;
(b) The lingering negative effects of the policies and practices of
redlining and discrimination on living Nebraskans;
(c) The manner in which instructional resources and technologies are
being used to deny the legal, economic, educational, and societal harms
of redlining and the crimes against Nebraskans that lived in cities of
the metropolitan classes; and
(d) The ways in which societal institutions, public and private,
including higher education, corporate, religious, and associational
institutions benefited directly from redlining;
(2) Recommend appropriate ways to educate the public of the task
force's findings;
-4-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
(3) Recommend appropriate remedies in consideration of the task
force's findings; and
(4) Electronically submit a report to the Legislature, together with
any recommendations.
Sec. 4. (1) The Restitution and Redress for Redlining Task Force is
hereby established.
(2) The task force consists of seven voting members as follows:
(a) Two members of the Commission on African American Affairs;
(b) Three members from the second congressional district;
(c) One member from the first congressional district; and
(d) One member from the third congressional district.
(3) Members of the task force shall not have any affiliation with a
political party.
(4) Members of the task force shall be drawn from diverse
backgrounds to represent the interests of communities impacted by
redlining throughout the state and shall have experience working to
implement reform when and where necessary to make life better for
Nebraskans that have been discriminated against based on redlining or
other similar state-sanctioned measures.
(5) The members of the task force shall be appointed by the Governor
subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the standing
committee of the Legislature which has subject matter jurisdiction.
(6) Members of the task force shall serve terms until the task force
terminates.
(7) The task force shall appoint members to fill vacancies as
warranted.
(8) The members of the task force shall select a member to serve as
chairperson, and may select another member to serve as vice-chairperson.
(9) The members of the task force shall serve without compensation,
but they shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for expenses incurred
incident to such service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
-5-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
(10) Five members of the task force shall constitute a quorum.
(11) The Governor shall make the appointments required by this
section on or before October 1, 2025. The chairperson of the task force
shall call the first meeting of the task force on or before November 1,
2025.
Sec. 5. The Restitution and Redress for Redlining Task Force shall:
(1) Identify, compile, and synthesize the relevant corpus of
evidentiary documentation of the policies and practices of redlining that
existed within cities of a metropolitan class in Nebraska from the origin
and conception of the state-sanctioned discriminatory practices of
redlining in Nebraska;
(2) Recommend appropriate ways to educate the public of the task
force's findings;
(3) Recommend appropriate remedies in consideration of the task
force's findings. In making recommendations, the task force shall
address, among other issues, all of the following:
(a) How the recommendations comport with the current national and
international standards of remedies for wrongs and injuries caused by the
state that include restoration, restitution and redress;
(b) How Nebraska laws and policies continue to disproportionately
and negatively affect African Americans as a group and perpetuate the
lingering material and psychosocial effects of redlining;
(c) How the injuries resulting from matters described in this
section can be reversed, and how to provide appropriate policies,
programs, projects, and recommendations for the purpose of reversing the
injuries;
(d) How, in consideration of the task force's findings, any form of
compensation to victims of redlining and their descendants in Nebraska,
with a special consideration for Nebraskans who are living, elderly, or
at or under the Nebraska poverty line within cities of a metropolitan
class, and then to the descendants of persons disenfranchised in
-6-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
Nebraska, is calculated;
(e) What form of compensation should be awarded, through what
instrumentalities, and who should be eligible for such compensation; and
(f) How, in consideration of the task force's findings, any other
forms of rehabilitation or restitution to Nebraska descendants impacted
by redlining are warranted and what form and scope those measures should
take; and
(4) On or before November 1, 2026, and on or before each November 1
thereafter until the task force is terminated, electronically submit to
the Legislature a written report of any findings and recommendations of
the task force.
Sec. 6. (1) For the purpose of carrying out the Restitution and
Redress for Redlining Task Force Act, the task force may:
(a) Hold hearings and meet at any time and location in Nebraska;
(b) Request the attendance and testimony of witnesses;
(c) Request the production of books, records, correspondence,
memoranda, papers, and documents; and
(d) Seek an order from a district court to compel testimony or issue
a subpoena.
(2) Any subcommittee or member of the task force may, if authorized
by the task force, take any action that the task force is authorized to
take pursuant to this section.
(3) The task force may acquire directly from the head of any state
agency available information that the task force considers useful in the
discharge of its duties. All state agencies shall cooperate with the task
force with respect to such information and shall furnish all information
requested by the task force to the extent permitted by law, regardless of
whether such information is confidential or exempt from disclosure under
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09. The task force and its members shall
maintain the confidentiality of any such information that is confidential
or exempt from disclosure.
-7-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
Sec. 7. (1) The Restitution and Redress for Redlining Task Force
may appoint and fix the compensation of such personnel as the task force
considers appropriate.
(2) The task force shall have the administrative, technical, and
legal assistance of the Attorney General.
(3) The task force may procure supplies, services, and property by
contracts in accordance with applicable laws and rules, and regulations.
(4) The task force may enter into contracts with public and private
entities for the purposes of conducting research or surveys, preparing
reports, and performing other activities necessary for the discharge of
the duties of the task force.
Sec. 8. (1) The Restoration Study Fund is created. The State
Treasurer shall credit to the fund such money as is transferred to the
fund by the Legislature, including from the Marijuana and Controlled
Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund, or donated as gifts, bequeaths,
bequests, or other contributions to such funds from public or private
entities.
(2) The fund shall be expended by the Restitution and Redress for
Redlining Task Force to carry out the Restitution and Redress for
Redlining Task Force Act. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 9. The Restitution and Redress for Redlining Task Force Act
shall terminate on November 1, 2028.
Sec. 10. Section 77-4310.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-4310.01 (1) Proceeds of the tax imposed by section 77-4303 shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as provided in this
section. follows:
(2) Beginning on the effective date of this act and until November
-8-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
1, 2028, all such proceeds shall be credited to the Restoration Study
Fund.
(3) Beginning November 1, 2028:
(a) (1) Five percent of such proceeds shall be credited to the
Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund; and
(b) (2) Of the remaining proceeds:
(i) (a) Fifty percent shall be remitted to the respective counties
from which the proceeds originated for credit to the County Drug Law
Enforcement and Education Fund of each such county. Money remitted to a
county pursuant to this subdivision shall be remitted to the county
treasurer of such county for credit to such fund. For purposes of this
subdivision, county from which the proceeds originated shall mean: (A)
(i) If the proceeds result from seizure under the Uniform State Tax Lien
Registration and Enforcement Act of property located in a county other
than the county in which the dealer resides, the county in which the
seizure was made; and (B) (ii) in all other cases, the county in which
the dealer resides; and
(ii) (b) All remaining funds, including those which did not
originate in a county, shall be credited to the Nebraska State Patrol
Drug Control and Education Cash Fund.
Sec. 11. Section 77-4310.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
77-4310.03 There is hereby created the Marijuana and Controlled
Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund. Money in the fund shall be used
by the Tax Commissioner for the purposes of administering, collecting,
and enforcing the tax imposed by section 77-4303, except that transfers
may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the
Legislature. Until November 1, 2028, the Legislature may make transfers
from the fund to the Restorations Study Fund. Any money in the Marijuana
and Controlled Substances Tax Administration Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
-9-

LB487 LB487
2025 2025
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 12. Original sections 77-4310.01 and 77-4310.03, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-10-